Georgia, session 2025_26, SB139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
5 SECTION 1.
6 An Act to incorporate the City of Mulberry, approved February 13, 2024 (Ga. L. 2024, p.
7 3518), is amended by revising the description of the corporate limits of the City of Mulberry
8 in Appendix A by adding at the end the following:
9 "2025 Addition
10 In addition to all other territory included within the corporate limits of said city, the
11 corporate limits shall specifically include the following described property, all of which is
12 located in Gwinnett County, Georgia:
13 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60678, Page 340, Gwinnett
14 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 1 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
15 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 13238, Page 238, Gwinnett
16 County Land Records.
17 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57716, Page 854, Gwinnett
18 County Land Records.
19 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56032, Page 703, Gwinnett
20 County Land Records.
21 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58223, Page 651, Gwinnett
22 County Land Records.
23 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 10208, Page 210, Gwinnett
24 County Land Records.
25 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55354, Page 385, Gwinnett
26 County Land Records.
27 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 10146, Page 293, Gwinnett
28 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
29 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3002A393.
30 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 11260, Page 308, Gwinnett
31 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 2 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
32 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 10146, Page 293, Gwinnett
33 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
34 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3002 154.
35 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 40711, Page 80, Gwinnett
36 County Land Records.
37 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 44832, Page 258, Gwinnett
38 County Land Records.
39 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55232, Page 445, Gwinnett
40 County Land Records.
41 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55371, Page 581, Gwinnett
42 County Land Records.
43 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56861, Page 169, Gwinnett
44 County Land Records.
45 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58036, Page 499, Gwinnett
46 County Land Records.
47 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 49191, Page 574, Gwinnett
48 County Land Records.
49 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 47941, Page 759, Gwinnett
50 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 3 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
51 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58038, Page 286, Gwinnett
52 County Land Records.
53 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 44376, Page 67, Gwinnett
54 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
55 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1001 777.
56 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55747, Page 641, Gwinnett
57 County Land Records.
58 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55747, Page 642, Gwinnett
59 County Land Records.
60 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55543, Page 203, Gwinnett
61 County Land Records.
62 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 44376, Page 67, Gwinnett
63 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
64 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1001 773.
65 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 52911, Page 733, Gwinnett
66 County Land Records.
67 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 61335, Page 819, Gwinnett
68 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 4 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
69 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58198, Page 786, Gwinnett
70 County Land Records.
71 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60984, Page 237, Gwinnett
72 County Land Records.
73 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60888, Page 594, Gwinnett
74 County Land Records.
75 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54888, Page 223, Gwinnett
76 County Land Records.
77 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56610, Page 271, Gwinnett
78 County Land Records.
79 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 20515, Page 232, Gwinnett
80 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
81 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1001 144.
82 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60518, Page 68, Gwinnett
83 County Land Records.
84 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 20515, Page 232, Gwinnett
85 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
86 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1001 053.
S. B. 139
- 5 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
87 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 20515, Page 232, Gwinnett
88 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
89 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1001 024.
90 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59584, Page 835, Gwinnett
91 County Land Records.
92 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54813, Page 107, Gwinnett
93 County Land Records.
94 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 15362, Page 138, Gwinnett
95 County Land Records.
96 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 50492, Page 627, Gwinnett
97 County Land Records.
98 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55300, Page 268, Gwinnett
99 County Land Records.
100 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56080, Page 606, Gwinnett
101 County Land Records.
102 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56136, Page 554, Gwinnett
103 County Land Records.
104 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 47066, Page 647, Gwinnett
105 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 6 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
106 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 52727, Page 781, Gwinnett
107 County Land Records.
108 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 22948, Page 134, Gwinnett
109 County Land Records.
110 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55081, Page 153, Gwinnett
111 County Land Records.
112 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 14460, Page 155, Gwinnett
113 County Land Records.
114 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60654, Page 331, Gwinnett
115 County Land Records.
116 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 17825, Page 261, Gwinnett
117 County Land Records.
118 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60641, Page 48, Gwinnett
119 County Land Records.
120 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58764, Page 244, Gwinnett
121 County Land Records.
122 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55714, Page 605, Gwinnett
123 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 7 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
124 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 61108, Page 272, Gwinnett
125 County Land Records.
126 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59776, Page 688, Gwinnett
127 County Land Records.
128 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 51393, Page 696, Gwinnett
129 County Land Records.
130 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56348, Page 557, Gwinnett
131 County Land Records.
132 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56529, Page 734, Gwinnett
133 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
134 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7182 002.
135 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56529, Page 734, Gwinnett
136 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
137 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7182 112.
138 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57322, Page 365, Gwinnett
139 County Land Records.
140 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58875, Page 867, Gwinnett
141 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 8 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
142 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 51262, Page 611, Gwinnett
143 County Land Records.
144 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59032, Page 794, Gwinnett
145 County Land Records.
146 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 48797, Page 218, Gwinnett
147 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
148 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7182 026.
149 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 48797, Page 218, Gwinnett
150 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
151 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7182 028.
152 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58714, Page 284, Gwinnett
153 County Land Records.
154 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 11205, Page 314, Gwinnett
155 County Land Records.
156 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 37659, Page 53, Gwinnett
157 County Land Records.
158 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 50667, Page 222, Gwinnett
159 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 9 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
160 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59622, Page 231, Gwinnett
161 County Land Records.
162 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 8482, Page 42, Gwinnett
163 County Land Records.
164 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 16628, Page 248, Gwinnett
165 County Land Records.
166 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59260, Page 717, Gwinnett
167 County Land Records.
168 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55867, Page 162, Gwinnett
169 County Land Records.
170 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55464, Page 735, Gwinnett
171 County Land Records.
172 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56410, Page 745, Gwinnett
173 County Land Records.
174 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60379, Page 235, Gwinnett
175 County Land Records.
176 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 27910, Page 26, Gwinnett
177 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 10 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
178 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55586, Page 1, Gwinnett
179 County Land Records.
180 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 12096, Page 114, Gwinnett
181 County Land Records.
182 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 50249, Page 917, Gwinnett
183 County Land Records.
184 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 52096, Page 776, Gwinnett
185 County Land Records.
186 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 51621, Page 676, Gwinnett
187 County Land Records.
188 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55615, Page 488, Gwinnett
189 County Land records.
190 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 53229, Page 575, Gwinnett
191 County Land Records.
192 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 48329, Page 568, Gwinnett
193 County Land Records.
194 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 52842, Page 124, Gwinnett
195 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 11 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
196 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 61168, Page 23, Gwinnett
197 County Land Records.
198 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 13238, Page 1, Gwinnett
199 County Land Records.
200 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56069, Page 685, Gwinnett
201 County Land Records.
202 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 9768, Page 85, Gwinnett
203 County Land Records.
204 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56340, Page 843, Gwinnett
205 County Land Records.
206 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54271, Page 800, Gwinnett
207 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
208 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1003 707.
209 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54271, Page 800, Gwinnett
210 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
211 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1003 005A.
212 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 49202, Page 465, Gwinnett
213 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 12 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
214 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 18793, Page 36, Gwinnett
215 County Land Records.
216 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54763, Page 163, Gwinnett
217 County Land Records.
218 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54787, Page 93, Gwinnett
219 County Land Records.
220 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 47987, Page 275, Gwinnett
221 County Land Records.
222 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 61275, Page 142, Gwinnett
223 County Land Records.
224 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59324, Page 322, Gwinnett
225 County Land Records.
226 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 13018, Page 130 Gwinnett
227 County Land Records.
228 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59342, Page 51, Gwinnett
229 County Land Records.
230 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54590, Page 785, Gwinnett
231 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 13 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
232 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 8065, Page 59, Gwinnett
233 County Land Records.
234 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54172, Page 577, Gwinnett
235 County Land Records.
236 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 52426, Page 334, Gwinnett
237 County Land Records.
238 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54404, Page 225, Gwinnett
239 County Land Records.
240 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57931, Page 691, Gwinnett
241 County Land Records.
242 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57034, Page 704, Gwinnett
243 County Land Records.
244 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57034, Page 702, Gwinnett
245 County Land Records.
246 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 7779, Page 151, Gwinnett
247 County Land Records.
248 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 50167, Page 488, Gwinnett
249 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 14 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
250 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60440, Page 174, Gwinnett
251 County Land Records.
252 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60722, Page 761, Gwinnett
253 County Land Records.
254 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 51188, Page 344, Gwinnett
255 County Land Records.
256 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58558, Page 667, Gwinnett
257 County Land Records.
258 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58034, Page 680, Gwinnett
259 County Land Records.
260 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 41604, Page 277, Gwinnett
261 County Land Records.
262 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 53150, Page 4, Gwinnett
263 County Land Records.
264 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 24736, Page 111, Gwinnett
265 County Land Records.
266 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 61306, Page 550, Gwinnett
267 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 15 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
268 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 52646, Page 208, Gwinnett
269 County Land Record.
270 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57277, Page 884, Gwinnett
271 County Land Records.
272 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 5971, Page 18, Gwinnett
273 County Land Records.
274 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55023, Page 862, Gwinnett
275 County Land Records.
276 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56091, Page 593, Gwinnett
277 County Land Records.
278 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57572, Page 443, Gwinnett
279 County Land Records.
280 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 49699, Page 272, Gwinnett
281 County Land Records.
282 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 18403, Page 88, Gwinnett
283 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
284 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 208.
S. B. 139
- 16 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
285 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 18403, Page 88, Gwinnett
286 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
287 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 086.
288 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 51883, Page 425, Gwinnett
289 County Land Records.
290 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54189, Page 229, Gwinnett
291 County Land Records.
292 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 61256, Page 831, Gwinnett
293 County Land Records.
294 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54183, Page 725, Gwinnett
295 County Land Records.
296 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 53522, Page 648, Gwinnett
297 County Land Records.
298 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 57574, Page 558, Gwinnett
299 County Land Records.
300 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 16983, Page 256, Gwinnett
301 County Land Records.
302 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 60351, Page 83, Gwinnett
303 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 17 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
304 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55566, Page 640, Gwinnett
305 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
306 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 023E.
307 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55566, Page 640, Gwinnett
308 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
309 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 426.
310 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 49723, Page 620, Gwinnett
311 County Land Records.
312 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 10883, Page 125, Gwinnett
313 County Land Records.
314 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 50628, Page 332, Gwinnett
315 County Land Records.
316 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56297, Page 486, Gwinnett
317 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
318 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001B134.
319 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 55504, Page 864, Gwinnett
320 County Land Records.
321 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book Deed Book 59486, Page 673,
322 Gwinnett County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 18 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
323 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56297, Page 486, Gwinnett
324 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
325 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001B140.
326 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 10950, Page 245, Gwinnett
327 County Land Records.
328 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56450, Page 634, Gwinnett
329 County Land Records.
330 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 29380, Page 116, Gwinnett
331 Count Land Records.
332 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56746, Page 331, Gwinnett
333 County Land Records.
334 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 61316, Page 661, Gwinnett
335 County Land Records.
336 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 61411, Page 164, Gwinnett
337 County Land Records.
338 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 9108, Page 101, Gwinnett
339 County Land Records.
340 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54375, Page 931, Gwinnett
341 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 19 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
342 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54334, Page 138, Gwinnett
343 County Land Records.
344 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 51363, Page 825, Gwinnett
345 County Land Records.
346 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 56631, Page 481, Gwinnett
347 County Land Records.
348 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 51894, Page 510, Gwinnett
349 County Land Records.
350 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59921, Page 731, Gwinnett
351 County Land Records.
352 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59702, Page 858, Gwinnett
353 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
354 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 2003D186D.
355 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59702, Page 858, Gwinnett
356 County Land Records, further identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax
357 Assessors on the effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 2003D186B.
358 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 50694, Page 529, Gwinnett
359 County Land Records.
S. B. 139
- 20 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
360 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 41935, Page 64, Gwinnett
361 County Land Records.
362 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58424, Page 78. Gwinnett
363 County Land Records.
364 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 58191, Page 437, Gwinnett
365 County Land Records.
366 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 59816, Page 451, Gwinnett
367 County Land Records.
368 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 21721, Page 217, Gwinnett
369 County Land Records.
370 All that tract or parcel of land as described in Deed Book 54023, Page 768, Gwinnett
371 County Land Records.
372 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
373 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7098 104.
374 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
375 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1001 121.
376 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
377 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7181 021.
S. B. 139
- 21 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
378 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
379 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7182 038.
380 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
381 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 7182 439.
382 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
383 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1003 117.
384 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
385 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1003 217.
386 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
387 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1003 133.
388 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
389 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1003 116.
390 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
391 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1003 219.
392 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
393 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1003 139.
394 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
395 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1003 122.
S. B. 139
- 22 -

25 LC 47 3389S (SCS)
396 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
397 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 1004 085.
398 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
399 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 3001 021.
400 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
401 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 2001 230.
402 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
403 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 2003 124.
404 The property identified by the Gwinnett County Board of Tax Assessors on the
405 effective date of this Addition with tax parcel ID number 2003 083."
406 SECTION 2.
407 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 139
- 23 -